Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2704.32
Projects outside the United States; refund of tax.

When a written contract exists for a construction, alteration, or improvement project outside the United States or its territories or possessions, a contractor may apply for a refund of the sales and use tax paid to the State of Nebraska on building materials actually annexed to real estate in the project outside of the United States or its territories or possessions.

Laws 1992, LB 871, § 56;

Laws 1993, LB 345, § 51;

Laws 2004, LB 1017, § 15.